Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 9. Port Authorities.

Sec. 29.35.600.
Purpose of authorities.

The purpose of a port authority is to provide for the development of a port or ports for transportation related commerce within the territory of the authority.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.605.
Establishment of port authorities.

A port authority may be created by one of the following means:

the governing body of a municipality may create by ordinance a port authority as a public corporation of the municipality;

the governing bodies of two or more municipalities may create by parallel ordinances adopted by each of the governing bodies a port authority as a public corporation of the municipalities.

One or more municipalities may join an authority established under (a)(1) or (2) of this section upon the adoption of parallel ordinances by the governing bodies of each affected municipality.

A port authority created under this section is a body corporate and politic and an instrumentality of the municipality or municipalities creating it but having a separate and independent legal existence.

Creation of a port authority under AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

is an exercise of a municipality’s transportation system powers.

The enabling ordinance by which a port authority is established must specify the powers, boundaries, and limitations of the port authority.

An ordinance creating a port authority shall require approval by the voters of the municipality or municipalities participating in the authority in order for the authority to be established.

Nothing in AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.725

prevents a municipality or municipalities from creating or participating in a public corporation, including a port authority, in any form or manner not prohibited by law. However, the provisions of AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.725

only apply to and may only be utilized by a port authority created under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.610.
Dissolution of a port authority.

The enabling ordinance by which a port authority is created must provide for the manner by which a port authority may be dissolved.

If an authority ceases to exist, its assets shall be distributed to the municipalities that participated in the authority in proportion to the difference between their contributions to the authority and any outstanding debt or obligation of that municipality to the authority, provided that any obligation to bondholders then outstanding shall first be satisfied in full.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.615.
Municipal property.

A municipality may transfer and otherwise convey or lease real property, and any improvements to it, to an authority for use by the authority for the purposes set out in the ordinance adopted under AS

29.35.605

.

A municipality may transfer and otherwise assign or lease personal property to an authority for use by the authority for the purposes set out in the ordinance adopted under AS

29.35.605

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.620.
Powers.

If provided in the enabling ordinance, an authority may

sue and be sued;

have a seal and alter it at pleasure;

acquire an interest in a project as necessary or appropriate to provide financing for the project, whether by purchase, gift, or lease;

lease to others a project acquired by it and upon the terms and conditions the authority may consider advisable, including, without limitation, provisions for purchase or renewal;

sell, by installment sale or otherwise, exchange, donate, convey, or encumber in any manner by mortgage or by creation of another security interest, real or personal property owned by it, or in which it has an interest, including a project, when, in the judgment of the authority, the action is in furtherance of the authority’s purposes;

accept gifts, grants, or loans, under the terms and conditions imposed under the gift, grant, or loan, and enter into contracts, conveyances or other transactions with a federal agency or an agency or instrumentality of the state, a municipality, private organization, or other person;

deposit or invest its funds, subject to agreements with bondholders;

purchase or insure loans to finance the costs of projects;

provide for security within the boundaries of the authority;

enter into loan agreements with respect to one or more projects upon the terms and conditions the authority considers advisable;

acquire, manage, and operate projects as the authority considers necessary or appropriate to serve the authority’s purposes;

assist private lenders to make loans to finance the costs of projects through loan commitments, short-term financing, or otherwise;

charge fees or other forms of remuneration for the use or possession of projects in accordance with the agreements described in this section, other agreements relating to the projects, covenants, or representations made in bond documents relating to the projects, or regulations of the authority relating to the projects;

exercise the powers of eminent domain and declaration of taking within its physical boundaries under AS

29.35.030

to acquire land or materials for authority purposes;

regulate land use within the boundaries of the authority;

defend and indemnify a current or former member of the board, employee, or agent of the authority against all costs, expenses, judgments, and liabilities, including attorney fees, incurred by or imposed upon that person in connection with civil or criminal action in which the person is involved as a result of the person’s affiliation with the authority if the person acted in good faith on behalf of the authority and within the scope of the person’s official duties and powers;

purchase insurance to protect and hold harmless its employees, agents, and board members from an action, claim, or proceeding arising out of the performance, purported performance, or failure to perform in good faith, of duties for, or employment with the authority and to hold them harmless from expenses connected with the defense, settlement, or monetary judgments from that action, claim, or proceeding; the purchase of insurance is subject to the discretion of the board; insurance purchased under this paragraph may not be considered compensation to the insured person; and

protect its assets, services, and employees by purchasing insurance or providing for certain self-insurance retentions; an authority may also maintain casualty, property, business interruption, marine, boiler and machinery, pollution liability, and other insurance in amounts reasonably calculated to cover potential claims against the authority or a municipality for bodily injury, death or disability, and property damage that may arise from or be related to authority operations and activities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.625.
Bonds of a port authority; superior court jurisdiction.

If authorized by the enabling ordinance, an authority may borrow money and may issue bonds on which the principal and interest are payable

exclusively from the income and receipts of, or other money derived from, the project financed with the proceeds of the bonds;

exclusively from the income and receipts of, or other money derived from, designated projects or other sources whether or not they are financed, insured, or guaranteed in whole or in part with the proceeds of the bonds; or

from its income and receipts generally or a designated part or parts of them.

All bonds may be sold at public or private sale in the manner, for the price or prices, and at the time or times that the authority may determine.

Before issuing bonds, an authority shall provide for consideration at least sufficient, in the judgment of the authority, to pay the principal and interest on the bonds as they become due and to create and maintain the reserves for the payment that the authority considers necessary or desirable and meet all obligations in connection with the lease or agreement and all costs necessary to service the bonds, unless the lease or agreement provides that the obligations are to be met or costs are to be paid by a party other than the authority.

Bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the authority, be dated, and shall mature as the resolution may provide, except that a bond may not mature more than 40 years from the date of its issue. Bonds shall bear interest at the rate or rates, be in the denominations, be in the form, either coupon or registered, carry the registration privileges, be executed in the manner, be payable in the medium of payment, at the place or places, and be subject to the terms of redemption that the resolution or a subsequent resolution may provide.

All bonds issued under this section, regardless of form or character, are negotiable instruments for all of the purposes of AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code).

The superior court has jurisdiction to hear and determine suits, actions, or proceedings relating to an authority, including suits, actions, or proceedings brought to foreclose or otherwise enforce a mortgage, pledge, assignment, or security interest brought by or for the benefit or security of a holder of the authority’s bonds or by a trustee for or other representative of the holders.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.01 — AS
45.09, AS 45.12, and AS 45.14” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 29.35.630.
Bonds eligible for investment.

Bonds issued under AS

29.35.625

are securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the state and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banks, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds may be deposited with a state or municipal officer of an agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose that the deposit of bonds of the state is authorized by law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.635.
Validity of pledge.

The pledge of revenue of an authority to the payment of the principal or interest on bonds or notes of the authority is valid and binding from the time the pledge is made, and the revenue is immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery or further act. The lien of a pledge is valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind against the authority irrespective of whether those parties have notice of the lien of the pledge.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.640.
Credit of state or a municipality not pledged.

The state and municipalities participating in an authority are not liable for the debts of that authority. Bonds issued under AS

29.35.625

are payable solely from the revenue of the authority and do not constitute a

debt, liability, or obligation of the state or a municipality; or

pledge of the faith and credit of the state or a municipality.

An authority may not pledge the credit or the taxing power of the state or its municipalities. A bond issued under AS

29.35.625

must contain on its face a statement that

the authority is not obligated to pay it or the interest on it except from the revenue pledged for it; and

the faith and credit of the taxing power of the state or of a political subdivision of the state is not pledged to the payment of it.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.645.
Pledges of the state and municipalities.

The state and municipalities participating in the authority pledge to and agree with the holders of bonds issued under AS

29.35.625

and with the federal agency, if any, that loans or contributes funds in respect to a project of the authority, that the state and the municipalities participating in the authority will not limit or alter the rights and powers vested in the authority by its enabling ordinance or other law so that it is unable to fulfill the terms of a contract made by the authority with those holders or that federal agency, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of those holders or that federal agency until the bonds, together with the interest on them and interest on unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with an action or proceeding by or on behalf of those holders or that federal agency, are fully met and discharged. An authority is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the state and the municipalities participating in the authority, insofar as it refers to holders of bonds of the authority, in a contract with those holders, and insofar as it relates to a federal agency, in a contract with that federal agency.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.650.
Limitation of liability.

A liability incurred by an authority shall be satisfied exclusively from the assets or revenue of the authority. A creditor or other person does not have a right of action against the state or a municipality participating in an authority because of a debt, obligation, or liability of an authority.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.655.
Limitation on personal liability.

A board member or employee of an authority is not subject to personal liability or accountability because of the execution or issuance of bonds.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.660.
Fidelity bond.

An authority shall obtain a fidelity bond in an amount determined by the board for board members and each executive officer responsible for accounts and finances of that authority. A fidelity bond must be in effect during the entire tenure in office of the bonded person.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.665.
No taxing authority.

An authority may not levy an income or other tax.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.670.
Exemption from taxation.

An authority exercising the powers granted by the enabling ordinance under AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

is in all respects for the benefit of the people of the municipalities participating in the authority and the people of the state in general, for their well-being and prosperity, and for the improvement of their social and economic condition. The real and personal property of an authority and its assets, income, and receipts are exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the state or a political subdivision of the state.

Bonds issued by the authority under AS

29.35.625

are issued for an essential public and governmental purpose; therefore, the bonds, interest and income from them, and all fees, charges, funds, revenue, income, and other money pledged or available to pay or secure the payment of the bonds or interest on them are exempt from taxation except for inheritance, transfer, and estate taxes.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (a) of this section, an authority and the municipalities participating in the authority may enter into agreements under which the authority agrees to pay the participating municipalities’ payments in lieu of taxes and special assessments on real and personal property of the authority that is within the taxing jurisdiction of the municipality.

Nothing in this section creates a tax exemption with respect to the interests of a business enterprise or other person, other than the authority, in property, assets, income, or receipts, whether or not financed under AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.675.
Development plan.

In the enabling ordinance establishing the authority under AS

29.35.605

the authority shall be

required to submit a development plan to the governing body of the municipality or municipalities participating in the authority; and

prohibited from undertaking the construction or acquisition of a project unless the project appears in a development plan submitted to and approved by the governing body of the municipality or municipalities participating in the authority.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.680.
Administration of port authorities; board.

An authority shall be governed by a board of directors, which shall exercise the powers of the authority. The enabling ordinance establishing the authority under AS

29.35.605

must specify the number, qualifications, manner of appointment or election, and terms of members of the board.

The board shall appoint a chief executive officer of the authority who serves at the pleasure of the board. The board shall fix the compensation of the chief executive officer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.685.
Continuation of collective bargaining agreements; application of AS 23.40.070 — 23.40.260.

A collective bargaining agreement for employees of the state or its political subdivisions who are transferred to an authority under AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

shall remain in effect for the term of the agreement or for a period of one year, whichever is longer, and shall be binding on the authority unless the parties agree to the contrary before the expiration of the agreement. A labor-management negotiation impasse declared after a transfer of employees under this subsection but before the negotiation of a new collective bargaining agreement shall be resolved as provided in the collective bargaining agreement, except that if the collective bargaining agreement does not provide for a resolution, then as provided in AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

.

Employees of the state or a political subdivision of the state transferred to an authority shall retain, for a period of one year following the date of transfer or for the duration of a collective bargaining agreement transferred under (a) of this section, whichever is greater, all rights of participation in fringe benefit programs available to the employees on the day before the transfer, or in programs substantially equivalent.

AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

apply to employees of an authority established under AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

unless all municipalities participating in the authority are exempt under AS

23.40.255(a)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, in (c) of this section, “AS

23.40.255(a)

” was substituted for “sec. 4, ch. 113, SLA 1972” to reflect the 2008 codification of sec. 4, ch. 113, SLA 1972.

Sec. 29.35.690.
Bylaws and regulations.

A board shall adopt bylaws and appropriate regulations consistent with the enabling ordinance to carry out its functions and purposes.

A board shall adopt bylaws as soon after the establishment of the authority as possible and may from time to time amend those bylaws. The bylaws may contain any provision not in conflict with law for the management of the business of the authority and for the conduct of the affairs of the authority, including

the time, place, and manner of calling, conducting, and giving notice of meetings of the board and committees of the board, if any;

the compensation of directors, if any;

the appointment and authority of committees of the board, if any;

the appointment, duties, compensation, and tenure of officers, directors, chief executive officer, and other employees, if any;

procedures for adopting regulations;

procedures for adopting bylaws;

procedures for making annual reports and financial statements; and

other matters for the conduct of business by the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.695.
Authority subject to public records and open meetings laws.

An authority established under AS

29.35.605

is subject to AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.220

and to AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.220

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.220

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.220

.

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.312

” in accordance with § 29(2), ch. 58, SLA 2010.

Sec. 29.35.700.
Annual report.

Within 90 days following the end of the fiscal year of an authority, the board shall distribute to the mayor and governing body of each municipality participating in the authority a report describing the operations and financial condition of the authority during the preceding fiscal year. The report may include suggestions for legislation relating to the structure, powers, or duties of the authority or operation of facilities of the authority. The report must itemize the cost of providing each category of service offered by the authority and the income generated by each category.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.705.
Audits.

The board shall have the financial records of an authority audited annually by an independent certified public accountant.

An authority shall make all of its financial records available to an auditor appointed by a municipality participating in the authority for examination.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.710.
Remedies.

A holder of bonds or notes or coupons attached to the bonds issued by an authority under AS

29.35.625

, and a trustee under a trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, except as restricted by a trust agreement or resolution, either at law or in equity, may

enforce all rights granted under AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

, the trust agreement or resolution, or another contract executed by the authority; and

compel the performance of all duties of the authority required by AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

or the trust agreement or resolution.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.715.
Claims.

For the purpose of judicial and regulatory proceedings by and against an authority, an authority and its board members and employees enjoy the same rights, privileges, and immunities as a municipality and municipal officers.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.720.
Conflicting laws inapplicable.

If provisions of AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

conflict with other provisions of this title, the provisions of AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

prevail.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.722.
Ownership or operation of certain state facilities prohibited.

The state may not, without the approval of the legislature,

convey or transfer the Alaska marine highway system, the Anchorage or Fairbanks international airports, or any other state asset, except undeveloped state land as provided in AS

38.05.810

or surplused property, to an authority; or

enter into an agreement with an authority under which the authority would operate the Alaska marine highway system, the Anchorage or Fairbanks international airports, or any other state facility, system, or function that employs one or more employees.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For Alaska marine highway system, see AS 19.65; for legislative approval regarding operation of the Clarke Bay Marine Highway Terminal, Prince of Wales Island, see ch. 88, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts.

Sec. 29.35.725.
Definitions.

In AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“authority” means a port authority established under AS

29.35.605

;

“board” means the board of directors of an authority;

“bonds” includes bonds, bond anticipation notes, notes, refunding bonds, or other forms of indebtedness of the authority;

“bylaws” or “bylaws of the authority” means the guidelines adopted by and amended by the board from time to time in accordance with AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

;

“port” means a facility of transportation related commerce located within the state;

“project” means a port, dock, and administrative facilities, including property necessary in connection with the operation of a port;

“project cost” or “cost of a project” means all or any part of the aggregate costs determined by an authority to be necessary to finance the construction or acquisition of a project, including without limitation to the cost of acquiring real property, the cost of constructing buildings and improvements, the cost of financing the project, including, without limitation, interest charges before, during, or after construction or acquisition of the project, costs related to the determination of the feasibility, planning, design, or engineering of the project and, to the extent determined necessary by the authority, administrative expenses, the cost of machinery or equipment to be used in the operation or rehabilitation of a port, and all other costs, charges, fees, and expenses that may be determined by the authority to be necessary to finance the construction or acquisition;

“real property” or “land” means any interest in real property, including tidal and submerged land, and any right appurtenant to the interest, and without limitation, interests less than full title such as easements, uses, leases, and licenses;

“regulation” means a standard of general application or the amendment, supplement, revision, or repeal of a standard adopted by an authority to implement, interpret, or make specific the law enforced or administered by it or to govern its procedure.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)

Sec. 29.35.730.
Short title.

AS

29.35.600

—

29.35.730

may be referred to as the Municipal Port Authority Act.

History.

(§ 2 ch 97 SLA 1992)